Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 12 Firewood and Charcoal

47-12-1.
Standard cord.

The cord shall measure in quantity equal to a cord of eight feet (8´) in length, four feet (4´) in width, and four feet (4´) in height, including one-half (1/2) of the kerf, and be well stowed and closely laid together.

History of Section.

G. L. 1896, ch. 149, § 1; G. L. 1909, ch. 175, § 1; G. L. 1923, ch. 206, § 1; G. L. 1938, ch. 411, § 1; G. L. 1956, §

47-12-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 203, § 1.

47-12-2.
Cording fees.

Every person chosen by a town to be a corder of wood shall receive for cording and measuring not exceeding twelve cents (12¢) per cord, to be paid by the purchaser of the wood.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-2

.

47-12-3.
Sale of firewood.

Cordwood sold or offered or exposed for sale shall be four feet (4´) in length. The term “firewood” shall be construed to mean and include wood cut to any lengths of less than four feet (4´) and more than eight inches (8"). Cordwood and firewood shall be advertised, offered for sale, and sold only in terms of cubic feet or cubic meters which will be construed as indicating the closely stacked cubic foot or cubic meter content to be delivered to the purchaser. The terms “cord”, “face cord”, “pile”, “truckload”, or terms of similar import shall not be used in the advertising and sale of cordwood or firewood.

The term “kindling wood” shall be construed to mean and include all split wood, edgings, clippings, or other waste wood averaging eight inches (8") in length. The standard unit of measure for kindling wood shall be the bushel of two thousand, one hundred and fifty and forty-two hundredths cubic inches (2150.42 cu. in.).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-3

; P.L. 1980, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 68.

47-12-3.1.
Repealed.

47-12-4.
Fraudulent sale of firewood.

Whoever, except as otherwise provided, sells cordwood or firewood, shall cause a delivery ticket or sales invoice to be issued and delivered to the purchaser or his or her agent at the time of delivery of the wood. The delivery ticket or sales invoice shall include the name and address of the seller and the purchaser, the quantity delivered to the purchaser in terms of cubic feet or cubic meters, the date delivered, and the price of the quantity of wood delivered.

Whoever violates any provision of this or the preceding sections shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00), for the second offense by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100), and for each subsequent offense by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200). Whoever alters or substitutes a delivery ticket or sales invoice for fraudulent or deceptive purposes shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-4

; P.L. 1980, ch. 203, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 68.

47-12-5.
Repealed.

47-12-6.
Standard charcoal basket.

Every basket used in measuring charcoal brought into any town for sale shall be of the following dimensions: nineteen inches (19") in breadth in every part thereof, and seventeen and one-half inches (171/2”) deep, measuring from the highest part of the bottom of the basket perpendicularly to a level with the top of the basket.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-6

.

47-12-7.
Sealing of charcoal baskets.

Every basket shall be sealed by the sealer of weights and measures of the town where the person so using the basket shall usually reside, or of the town where the coal shall be so measured for sale, and shall also be well heaped.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

42-12-7

.

47-12-8.
Sale of charcoal in unsealed or nonstandard basket.

Every person who shall measure charcoal offered for sale in any basket of other dimensions than as aforesaid, or not sealed as aforesaid, shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-8

; P.L. 1980, ch. 343, § 1.

47-12-9.
Seizure of nonstandard charcoal baskets — Prosecution of violations.

The town councils of the several towns may appoint, as occasion may require, some suitable person or persons to seize and secure, within their respective towns, all baskets used for measuring coal that shall not be of the dimensions aforesaid, and sealed as aforesaid, and to prosecute every person who shall be guilty of any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter; but no person shall be obliged to measure charcoal, where the quantity shall be agreed on by the buyer and seller.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 7; G.L. 1938, cf. 411, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-9

.

47-12-10.
Seizure of nonstandard baskets by town sealer — Prosecution of violations.

The town or city sealers of the several cities and towns, and such persons as the town councils of the several towns may appoint, shall seize and secure all baskets used for measuring coal, short wood, or kindling wood, that shall not be sealed, or shall not be of the dimensions provided by law, and prosecute every person who shall be guilty of any violation of the provisions of the laws defining the size of the baskets.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-10

.

47-12-11.
Penalty for sealing nonstandard basket.

Every sealer of weights and measures who shall seal any basket not being of the lawful dimensions, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 149, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 175, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 206, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 411, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

47-12-11

.